California, session 20252026, AB1316.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3031.1 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:3031.1. (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, the department shall ensure that every person who purchases a hunting license receives, at minimum, information on all of the following topics:(1) The safe storage of firearms.(2) California’s child access prevention laws.(3) Liability for parents and guardians who should have known their child could access a firearm at home.(4) Basic California firearm laws.(5) How to legally transfer or relinquish a firearm.(b) The department, in cooperation with the Department of Justice, may promulgate regulations regarding the implementation of the requirement in subdivision (a), and may include additional information to be provided with a hunting license.